Washington statutes.
RCW 43.365.050

Review by joint legislative audit and review committee—Recommendation to legislature.

(1) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to increase the viability of the motion picture and film industry and associated creative industries in Washington state. It is the legislature's intent to increase the credit available under RCW 82.04.4489 in order to attract additional motion picture and film projects, thereby increasing family-wage jobs.

(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review and make a recommendation to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026, regarding the effectiveness of the motion picture competitiveness program including, but not limited to, the amount of state revenue generated, the amount and number of family-wage jobs with benefits created, adherence to the criteria in RCW 43.365.020, changes in Washington's share of the film employment market, and any other factors deemed appropriate by the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(3) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (2) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to tax data provided to the department of revenue and the annual survey required under RCW 43.365.040.

[ 2022 c 270 s 7; 2006 c 247 s 7.]